Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.431

Port district noise mitigation grant program—Joint legislative audit and review committee review.

In addition to the requirements of this chapter, the joint legislative audit and review committee must include in its review of the grant program under RCW 43.330.610 the number of homes remediated since June 6, 2024, and the number of homes remaining in need of noise mitigation remediation.

[ 2024 c 194 s 8.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—2024 c 194: See note following RCW 53.54.030.